Utah statutes.
57-8-54.   Statement from manager or management committee of unpaid assessment.

(1)  A manager or management committee shall issue a written statement indicating any unpaid assessment with respect to a unit owner's unit upon:

(a)  a written request by the unit owner; and

(b)  payment of a reasonable fee not to exceed $25.

(2)  A written statement under Subsection (1) is conclusive in favor of a person who relies on the written statement in good faith.

